District of Columbia statutes.
38-2104

Definition.

As used in the Interstate Agreement on Qualification of Educational Personnel, the term “Governor” when used with reference to the District of Columbia shall mean the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

Dec. 7, 1974, 88 Stat. 1615, Pub. L. 93-515, title I, § 104
1981 Ed., § 31-1304.
1973 Ed., § 31-1804.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.